Utah statutes.
53A-13-101.2.   Waivers of participation.

(1)  If a parent with legal custody or other legal guardian of a student, or a secondary student, determines that the student's participation in a portion of the curriculum or in an activity would require the student to affirm or deny a religious belief or right of conscience, or engage or refrain from engaging in a practice forbidden or required in the exercise of a religious right or right of conscience, the parent, guardian, or student may request:

(a)  a waiver of the requirement to participate; or

(b)  a reasonable alternative that requires reasonably equivalent performance by the student of the secular objectives of the curriculum or activity in question.

(2)  The school shall promptly notify a student's parent or guardian if the student makes a request under Subsection (1).

(3)  If a request is made under Subsection (1), the school shall:

(a)  waive the participation requirement;

(b)  provide a reasonable alternative to the requirement; or

(c)  notify the requesting party that participation is required.

(4)  The school shall ensure that the provisions of Subsection 53A-13-101.3(3) are met in connection with any required participation under Subsection (3)(c).

(5)  A student's academic or citizenship performance may not be penalized by school officials for the exercise of a religious right or right of conscience in accordance with the provisions of this section.



Amended by Chapter 114, 2007 General Session

